Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.080

Procurement policy—Director's responsibility and authority—Master contracts.

(1) The director is responsible for the development and oversight of policy for the procurement of goods and services by all state agencies under this chapter. When establishing policies, standards, and procedures, the director shall account for differentiation in procurement practices and needs among state agencies and strive to establish policies, standards, and procedures that promote greater efficiency in procurement.

(2) The director is authorized to adopt rules, policies, and guidelines governing the procurement, contracting, and contract management of any and all goods and services procured by state agencies under this chapter.

(3) The director or designee is the sole authority to enter into master contracts on behalf of the state.

[ 2012 c 224 s 9.]